New Jersey, session 221, A3721.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The State Capitol Joint Management Commission, established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1992, c.67 (C.52:31-37), shall enter into an agreement to obtain a commemorative representation of Alice Paul.  The representation shall show the head and shoulders of Alice Paul, and shall be displayed in an appropriate location in the State Capitol building. b.    The State Capitol Joint Management Commission shall select an alternative appropriate location to display the representation of Alice Paul during renovations to the State Capitol building. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately STATEMENT Alice Paul was born and raised in New Jersey.  Alice Pauls vision that women and men should be equal partners in society led to enormous changes in the rights and status of American women. One of her many accomplishments include helping to secure passage of the 19th Amendment to the United States Constitution, granting women the right to vote. This bill requires the State Capitol Joint Management Commission to display a representation of Alice Paul in the State Capitol building.  The representation will recognize and honor Alice Pauls struggle for womens suffrage and the ratification of the 19th amendment to the United States Constitution.  August 18, 2020 marked the 100th anniversary of the passage of the 19th amendment.